Nebraska, session 109, LB663.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 23-114.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-114.01 (1) In order to avail itself of the powers conferred by section
23-114, the county board shall appoint a planning commission to be known as the
county planning commission. The members of the commission shall be residents of
the county to be planned and shall be appointed with due consideration to
geographical and population factors. Since the primary focus of concern and
control in county planning and land-use regulatory programs is the
unincorporated area, a majority of the members of the commission shall be
residents of unincorporated areas, except that this requirement shall not apply
to joint planning commissions. Members of the commission shall hold no county
or municipal office, except that a member may also be a member of a city,
village, or other type of planning commission. The term of each member shall be
three years, except that approximately one-third of the members of the first
commission shall serve for terms of one year, one-third for terms of two years,
and one-third for terms of three years. All members shall hold office until
their successors are appointed. Members of the commission may be removed by a
majority vote of the county board for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or
malfeasance in office or other good and sufficient cause upon written charges
being filed with the county board and after a public hearing has been held
regarding such charges. Vacancies occurring otherwise than through the
expiration of terms shall be filled for the unexpired terms by individuals
appointed by the county board. Members of the commission shall be compensated
for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with their
duties in an amount to be fixed by the county board. Reimbursement for mileage
shall be made at the rate provided in section 81-1176. Each county board may
provide a per diem payment for members of the commission of not to exceed
fifteen dollars for each day that each such member attends meetings of the
commission or is engaged in matters concerning the commission, but no member
shall receive more than one thousand dollars in any one year. Such per diem
payments shall be in addition to and separate from compensation for expenses.
(2) The county attorney, each member of the commission, and each member of
the county board of any county that has enacted county zoning regulations shall
undertake two hours of education per term on topics specific to the role of the
county attorney, commissioner, or board member when addressing matters subject
to this section.
(3) (2) The commission: (a) Shall prepare and adopt as its policy
statement a comprehensive development plan and such implemental means as a
capital improvement program, subdivision regulations, building codes, and a
zoning resolution; (b) shall consult with and advise public officials and
agencies, public utilities, civic organizations, educational institutions, and
citizens relating to the promulgation of implemental programs; (c) may delegate
authority to any of the groups named in subdivision (b) of this subsection to
conduct studies and make surveys for the commission; and (d) shall make
preliminary reports on its findings and hold public hearings before submitting
its final reports. The county board shall not hold its public meetings or take
action on matters relating to the comprehensive development plan, capital
improvements, building codes, subdivision development, or zoning until it has
received the recommendations of the commission.
(4)(a) (3) The commission may, with the consent of the governing body, in
its own name: (i) Make and enter into contracts with public or private bodies;
(ii) receive contributions, bequests, gifts, or grants of funds from public or
private sources; (iii) expend the funds appropriated to it by the county board;
(iv) employ agents and employees; and (v) acquire, hold, and dispose of
property.
(b) The commission may, on its own authority: (i) Make arrangements
consistent with its program; (ii) conduct or sponsor special studies or
planning work for any public body or appropriate agency; (iii) receive grants,
remuneration, or reimbursement for such studies or work; and (iv) at its public
hearings, summon witnesses, administer oaths, and compel the giving of
testimony.
(5)(a) (4) In all counties in the state, the county planning commission
may grant conditional uses or special exceptions to property owners for the use
of their property if the county board of commissioners or supervisors has
officially and generally authorized the commission to exercise such powers and
-1-

LB663 LB663
2026 2026
has approved the standards and procedures the commission adopted for equitably
and judiciously granting such conditional uses or special exceptions. The
granting of a conditional use permit or special exception shall only allow
property owners to put their property to a special use if it is among those
uses specifically identified in the county zoning regulations as
classifications of uses which may require special conditions or requirements to
be met by the owners before a use permit or building permit is authorized.
(b) The applicant for a conditional use permit or special exception for a
livestock operation specifically identified in the county zoning regulations as
a classification of use which may require special conditions or requirements to
be met within an area of a county zoned for agricultural use may request a
determination of the special conditions or requirements to be imposed by the
county planning commission or by the county board of commissioners or
supervisors if the board has not authorized the commission to exercise such
authority. Upon request the commission or board shall issue such determination
of the special conditions or requirements to be imposed in a timely manner.
Such special conditions or requirements to be imposed may include, but are not
limited to, the submission of information that may be separately provided to
state or federal agencies in applying to obtain the applicable state and
federal permits. Granting a conditional use permit or special exception by the
commission or county board shall be based solely on county zoning regulations.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to release the applicant from
complying with applicable rules and regulations of any local, state, or federal
agency or with any applicable state or federal permit requirements. A
commission or county board shall not require an applicant for a conditional use
permit or special exception to apply for or obtain any other permit from a
federal, state, or local agency as a condition for granting such conditional
use permit or special exception. The granting of a conditional use permit or
special exception by a commission or county board shall not relieve the
applicant of any requirement to obtain other necessary permits from any
federal, state, or local agency.
(c) The commission or the board may request and review, prior to making a
determination of the special conditions or requirements to be imposed,
reasonable information relevant to the conditional use or special exception. If
a determination of the special conditions or requirements to be imposed has
been made, final permit approval may be withheld subject only to a final review
by the commission or county board to determine whether there is a substantial
change in the applicant's proposed use of the property upon which the
determination was based and that the applicant has met, or will meet, the
special conditions or requirements imposed in the determination. When making
the determination as to whether the application for a conditional use permit or
special exception should be approved or denied, the commission and board shall
presume that the applicant for the permit will comply with all local, state,
and federal requirements. The burden of proof to the contrary shall rest on the
party challenging said presumption. Without factual evidence contrary to the
application, the commission or board shall approve the application.
(d) For purposes of this section, substantial change shall include any
significant alteration in the original application including a significant
change in the design or location of buildings or facilities, in waste disposal
methods or facilities, or in capacity.
(6) (5) The power to grant conditional uses or special exceptions as set
forth in subsection (5) (4) of this section shall be the exclusive authority of
the commission, except that the county board of commissioners or supervisors
may choose to retain for itself the power to grant conditional uses or special
exceptions for those classifications of uses specified in the county zoning
regulations. The county board of commissioners or supervisors may exercise such
power if it has formally adopted standards and procedures for granting such
conditional uses or special exceptions in a manner that is equitable and which
will promote the public interest. In an appeal of a decision by the county
planning commission or county board of commissioners or supervisors regarding a
conditional use or special exception, the appealing party shall have the burden
of proving by clear and convincing evidence that such decision (i) was
arbitrary, capricious, or illegal or (ii) did not adhere to the county's zoning
regulations. In any county other than a county in which is located a city of
the primary class, an appeal of a decision by the county planning commission or
county board of commissioners or supervisors regarding a conditional use or
special exception shall be made to the district court. In any county in which
is located a city of the primary class, an appeal of a decision by the county
planning commission regarding a conditional use or special exception shall be
made to the county board of commissioners or supervisors, and an appeal of a
decision by the county board of commissioners or supervisors regarding a
conditional use or special exception shall be made to the district court.
(7)(a) (6) Whenever a county planning commission or county board is
authorized to grant conditional uses or special exceptions pursuant to
subsection (5) (4) or (6) (5) of this section, the planning commission or
county board shall, with its decision to grant or deny a conditional use permit
or special exception, issue a statement of factual findings arising from the
record of proceedings that support the granting or denial of the conditional
use permit or special exception. If a county planning commission's role is
advisory to the county board, the county planning commission shall submit such
statement with its recommendation to the county board as to whether to approve
or deny a conditional use permit or special exception.
(b) Upon receipt by the planning commission of an application, the county
-2-

LB663 LB663
2026 2026
zoning administrator or commission shall have thirty days to determine if the
application is complete. If the administrator or commission determines the
application is incomplete, within ten days following such determination, the
administrator or commission shall notify the applicant in writing as to what
information is required to make the application complete. The administrator or
commission shall have thirty days after receipt of any additional information
provided by the applicant to redetermine if the application is complete. Within
ninety days after the commission receives a complete application, the
commission shall:
(i) If the commission has the authority to grant or deny a conditional use
permit or special exception, grant or deny such application; or
(ii) If the commission does not have the authority to grant or deny a
conditional use permit or special exception, make a recommendation to the board
that such application be granted or denied.
(c) Once the board has received the recommendation of the commission, the
board shall have thirty days to make its own determination if the application
is complete. If the board determines the application is incomplete, within ten
days following such determination, the board shall notify the applicant in
writing as to what information is required to make the application complete.
The board shall have thirty days after receipt of any additional information
provided by the applicant to redetermine if the application is complete. The
board shall have ninety days after receiving a complete application as
determined by the board to decide whether to grant or deny a conditional use
permit or special exception. If the board has not granted or denied a
conditional use permit or special exception by the end of such ninety-day
period, the conditional use permit or special exemption shall be deemed
granted.
(d) If, at any time after the board has received the recommendation of the
commission and before the expiration of the ninety-day period described in
subdivision (7)(b) of this section, the board comes into possession of
information which materially affects an application, the board may take action
during an open meeting of the board to require the submission of a new
application to the board or the presentation of information deemed necessary by
the board to the board at a hearing not less than ninety days after the board
takes such action. The board shall have ninety days after the submission of the
new application or the presentation of information to decide whether to grant
or deny the conditional use permit or special exception. If the board has not
granted or denied the conditional use permit or special exception by the end of
such ninety-day period, the conditional use permit or special exemption shall
be deemed granted.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, materially affect means having a
significant or substantial impact relating to state law, compliance with county
zoning regulations, or the rights of any affected party.
Sec. 2. Original section 23-114.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-3-